Nebraska, session 109, LB953.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB953 LB953
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-12,147, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-12,147 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the Department of Economic Development shall use the Site and Building
Development Fund to finance loans, grants, subsidies, credit
enhancements, and other financial assistance for industrial site and
building development and for expenses of the department as appropriated
by the Legislature for administering the fund. The following activities
are eligible for assistance from the fund:
(a) Grants or zero-interest loans to villages, cities, or counties
to acquire land, infuse infrastructure, or otherwise make large sites and
buildings ready for industrial development;
(b) Matching funds for new construction, rehabilitation, or
acquisition of land and buildings to assist villages, cities, and
counties;
(c) Technical assistance, design and finance services, and
consultation for villages, cities, and counties for the preparation and
creation of industrial-ready sites and buildings;
(d) Loan guarantees for eligible projects;
(e) Projects making industrial-ready sites and buildings more
accessible to business and industry;
(f) Infrastructure projects necessary for the development of
industrial-ready sites and buildings;
(g) Projects that mitigate the economic impact of a closure or
downsizing of a private-sector entity by making necessary improvements to
buildings and infrastructure;
(h) Public and private sector initiatives that will improve the
military value of military installations by making necessary improvements
to buildings and infrastructure, including, but not limited to, a grant
for the establishment of the United States Strategic Command Nuclear
Command, Control, and Communications public-private-partnership facility;
-2-

LB953 LB953
2026 2026
(i) A grant to a city of the second class that is served by two
first-class railroads, that is within fifteen miles of two state borders,
and that partners with public power utilities for purposes of expanding
electrical system capacities and enhancing redundancy and resilience;
(j) A grant of two million dollars to a city of the first class
located in the third congressional district if the property previously
housed a university or college that is no longer extant and if the
improvement and revitalization of the real property is for purposes of
supporting the housing, employment, and program needs of youth exiting
the foster care system. In addition, the real property may be used for
youth exiting juvenile court supervision in an out-of-home placement;
(k) Public and private sector initiatives that will improve the
value of cities of the second class that have partnered with the United
States Department of Defense or its contractors on upgrades to ground-
based nuclear deterrence. Such improvements include the construction of
electrical, drinking water, and clean water infrastructure; and
(l) Identification, evaluation, and development of large commercial
and industrial sites and building infrastructure to attract major
investment and employment opportunities for advanced manufacturing,
processing, trade, technology, aerospace, automotive, clean energy, life
science, and other transformational industries in Nebraska by means of
the department providing grants to or partnering with political
subdivisions, including inland port authorities under the Municipal
Inland Port Authority Act, or nonprofit economic development corporations
and entering into contracts for consulting, engineering, and development
studies to identify, evaluate, and develop large commercial and
industrial sites in Nebraska; and .
(m) Grants to political subdivisions and nationally and state
accredited golf associations to construct golf facilities and related
infrastructure. Such facilities shall be located within the boundaries of
a city of the metropolitan class.
-3-

LB953 LB953
2026 2026
(2) The Department of Economic Development shall use the subaccount
of the Site and Building Development Fund described in subsection (2) of
section 81-12,146 to provide financial assistance to any inland port
authority created under the Municipal Inland Port Authority Act to help
finance large shovel-ready commercial and industrial sites developed
under such act.
Sec. 2. Section 81-12,148, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,148 (1) Governmental subdivisions and Nebraska nonprofit
organizations are eligible to receive assistance under the Site and
Building Development Act. Any entity receiving assistance under
subsection (1) of section 81-12,147 shall provide, or cause to be
provided, matching funds for the eligible activity in an amount
determined by the Department of Economic Development, which amount shall
be at least equal to one hundred percent of the amount of assistance
provided by the Site and Building Development Fund. Nothing in the act
shall be construed to allow individuals or businesses to receive direct
loans from the fund.
(2) An applicant for a grant for development of a public-private-
partnership facility under subdivision (1)(h) of section 81-12,147 shall
provide the Director of Economic Development with a letter of support
from the United States Strategic Command prior to approval of the
application and with proof of the availability of twenty million dollars
in private or other funds for the facility. No funds shall be expended or
grants awarded until receipt of proof of the availability of twenty
million dollars in private or other funds for the facility and
certification is provided by the Director of Economic Development to the
budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of
Administrative Services.
(3) An applicant for a grant for development under subdivision (1)
(k) of section 81-12,147 is not required to meet the matching fund
-4-

LB953 LB953
2026 2026
requirements pursuant to this section but shall provide the Director of
Economic Development a letter from the United States Department of
Defense or contractor providing upgrades to ground-based nuclear
deterrence that infrastructure improvements, including the construction
of electrical, drinking water, and clean water infrastructure, will not
be included in the scope of the project. No grants shall be awarded or
funds expended until such letter is received.
(4)(a) An applicant for a grant for construction of a golf facility
under subdivision (1)(m) of section 81-12,147 shall, prior to approval of
the application, provide the Director of Economic Development with:
(i) Documentation demonstrating the facility's programming for
veterans;
(ii) Documentation demonstrating the facility's programming for
youth;
(iii) A letter of support from a nationally accredited golf
association;
(iv) A letter of support from a state accredited golf association;
(v) A letter of support from the mayor of the city of the
metropolitan class where the facility will be located; and
(vi) Proof of funding for at least eight percent of the total costs
of the construction.
(b) A grant issued under this subsection shall not exceed twenty
percent of the total costs of the construction.
(5) (4) This section does not apply to any inland port authority
receiving assistance under subsection (2) of section 81-12,147.
Sec. 3. Original sections 81-12,147 and 81-12,148, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-5-